Oklahoma, session 2026, SB960.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Oklahoma


Foreign Agents Registration Act”.


B. The purpose of this act is to provide public transparency


for the political and propaganda activities conducted by agents


representing principals from foreign countries of concern.





Req. No. 1008 Page 1


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13001 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


As used in this act:


1. “Agent of a foreign principal” shall mean:


a. any person who acts as an agent, representative,


employee, or servant, or any person who acts in any


other capacity at the order, request, or under the


direction or control of a foreign principal or of a


person any of whose activities are directly or


indirectly supervised, directed, controlled, financed,


or subsidized in whole or in part by a foreign


principal, and who directly or through any other


person:


(1) engages within this state in political activities


for or in the interests of such foreign


principal,


(2) acts within this state as a public relations


counsel, publicity agent, information service


employee, or political consultant for or in the


interests of such foreign principal,


(3) within this state solicits, collects, disburses,


or dispenses contributions, loans, money, or



Req. No. 1008 Page 2


other things of value for or in the interest of


such foreign principal, or


(4) within this state represents the interests of


such foreign principal before this state or any


political subdivision, agency, or official of


this state, and


b. any person who agrees, consents, assumes, or purports


to act as, or who is or holds himself or herself out


to be, whether or not pursuant to a contractual


relationship, an agent of a foreign principal as


defined in division (1) of subparagraph a of this


paragraph.


Agent of a foreign principal does not include any news or press


service or association organized under the laws of the United States


or of any state or other place subject to the jurisdiction of the


United States, or any newspaper, magazine, periodical, or other


publication for which there is on file with the United States Postal


Service information in compliance with federal law, solely by virtue


of any bona fide news or journalistic activities, including the


solicitation or acceptance of advertisements, subscriptions, or


other compensation therefor, as long as it is at least eighty


percent (80%) beneficially owned by, and its officers and directors


are, if any, citizens of the United States, and such news or press


service or association, newspaper, magazine, periodical, or other

Req. No. 1008 Page 3


publication is not owned, directed, supervised, controlled,


subsidized, or financed, and none of its policies are determined, by


any foreign principal as defined in paragraph 4 of this section, or


by any agent of a foreign principal required to register under this


act;


2. “Country of particular concern” shall mean any country


designated by the United States Secretary of State as hostile or a


Country of Particular Concern (CPC);


3. “Foreign political party” shall mean any organization or any


other combination of individuals in a country other than the United


States, or any unit or branch thereof, having for an aim or purpose,


or which is engaged in any activity devoted in whole or in part to,


the establishment, administration, control, or acquisition of


administration or control of a government of a foreign country or a


subdivision thereof, or the furtherance or influencing of the


political or public interests, policies, or relations of a


government of a foreign country or a subdivision thereof;


4. “Foreign principal” shall mean:


a. a government of a foreign country and a foreign


political party,


b. a person outside of the United States, unless it is


established that such person is an individual and a


citizen of and domiciled within the United States, or


that such person is not an individual and is organized

Req. No. 1008 Page 4


under or created by the laws of the United States or


of any state or other place subject to the


jurisdiction of the United States and has its


principal place of business within the United States,


c. a partnership, association, corporation, organization,


or other combination of persons organized under the


laws of or having its principal place of business in a


foreign country, or


d. a partnership, association, corporation, organization,


or other combination of persons that is at least


twenty percent (20%) beneficially owned by a


partnership, association, corporation, organization,


or other combination of persons organized under the


laws of or having its principal place of business in a


foreign country;


5. “Government of a foreign country” shall mean any person or


group of persons exercising sovereign de facto or de jure political


jurisdiction over any country, other than the United States, or over


any part of such country, and includes any subdivision of any such


group and any group or agency to which such sovereign de facto or de


jure authority or functions are directly or indirectly delegated.


Such term shall include any faction or body of insurgents within a


country assuming to exercise governmental authority regardless of



Req. No. 1008 Page 5


whether such faction or body of insurgents has been recognized by


the United States;


6. “Information service employee” shall mean any person who is


engaged in furnishing, disseminating, or publishing accounts,


descriptions, information, or data with respect to the political,


industrial, employment, economic, social, cultural, or other


benefits, advantages, facts, or conditions of any country other than


the United States or of any government of a foreign country or of a


foreign political party or of a partnership, association,


corporation, organization, or other combination of individuals


organized under the laws of, or having its principal place of


business in, a foreign country;


7. “Person” means an individual, partnership, association,


corporation, organization, or any other combination of individuals;


8. “Political activity” means any activity that the person


engaging in believes will, or that the person intends to, in any way


influence this state or any political subdivision, agency, or


official of this state, or any section of the public within this


state with reference to formulating, adopting, or changing the


domestic or foreign policies of the United States or of this state


with reference to the political or public interests, policies, or


relations of a government of a foreign country or a foreign


political party;



Req. No. 1008 Page 6


9. “Political consultant” means any person who engages in


informing or advising any other person with reference to the


policies of this state or the political or public interest,


policies, or relations of a foreign country or of a foreign


political party;


10. “Prints” means newspapers and periodicals, books,


pamphlets, sheet music, visiting cards, address cards, printing


proofs, engravings, photographs, pictures, drawings, plans, maps,


patterns to be cut out, catalogs, prospectuses, advertisements, and


printed, engraved, lithographed, or autographed notices of various


kinds, and, in general, all impressions or reproductions obtained on


paper or other material assimilable to paper, on parchment or on


cardboard, by means of printing, engraving, lithography, autography,


or any other easily recognizable mechanical process, with the


exception of the copying press, stamps with movable or immovable


type, and the typewriter;


11. “Public relations counsel” shall mean any person who


engages directly or indirectly in informing, advising, or in any way


representing a principal in any public relations matter pertaining


to political or public interests, policies, or relations of such


principal;


12. “Publicity agent” shall mean any person who engages


directly or indirectly in the publication or dissemination of oral,


visual, graphic, written, or pictorial information or matter of any

Req. No. 1008 Page 7


kind, including publication by means of advertising, books,


periodicals, newspapers, lectures, broadcasts, motion pictures, or


otherwise;


13. “Registration statement” shall mean the registration


statement and any supplements required to be filed with the Attorney


General under Section 3 or 4 of this act and shall include all


documents and papers required to be filed with the statement or


supplements, or amendatory of the statement or supplements, whether


attached or incorporated by reference; and


14. “United States”, when used in a geographical sense, means


the fifty States, the District of Columbia, and the territories, the


insular possessions, and all other places now or hereafter subject


to the civil or military jurisdiction of the United States.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13002 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. No person shall act as an agent of a foreign principal from


a country of particular concern unless he or she has filed with the


Attorney General a true and complete registration statement and


supplements as required by this subsection and subsection B of this


section, or unless he or she is exempt from registration under the


provisions of this act. Except as provided in this act, every


person who becomes an agent of a foreign principal from a country of


particular concern shall, within ten (10) days thereafter, file with

Req. No. 1008 Page 8


the Attorney General, in duplicate, a registration statement, under


oath on a form prescribed by the Attorney General. The obligation


of an agent of a foreign principal from a country of particular


concern to file a registration statement shall, after the tenth day


of his or her becoming such agent, continue from day to day, and


termination of such status shall not relieve such agent from his or


her obligation to file a registration statement for the period


during which he or she was an agent of a foreign principal from a


country of particular concern. The registration statement shall


include the following, which shall be regarded as material for the


purposes of this subsection:


1. The registrant’s name, principal business address, and all


other business addresses in the United States or elsewhere, and all


residence addresses, if any;


2. The status of the registrant; if an individual, nationality;


if a partnership, name, residence addresses, and nationality of each


partner and a true and complete copy of its articles of partnership;


if an association, corporation, organization, or any other


combination of individuals, the name, residence addresses, and


nationality of each director and officer and of each person


performing the functions of a director or officer and a true and


complete copy of its charter, articles of incorporation,


association, constitution, and bylaws, and amendments thereto; a


copy of every other instrument or document and a statement of the

Req. No. 1008 Page 9


terms and conditions of every oral agreement relating to its


organization, powers, and purposes; and a statement of its ownership


and control;


3. A comprehensive statement of the nature of the registrant’s


business; a complete list of the registrant’s employees and a


statement of the nature of the work of each; the name and address of


every foreign principal from a country of particular concern for


whom the registrant is acting, assuming or purporting to act, or has


agreed to act; the character of the business or other activities of


every such foreign principal from a country of particular concern,


and, if any such foreign principal from a country of particular


concern be other than a natural person, a statement of the ownership


and control of each; and the extent, if any, to which each such


foreign principal from a country of particular concern is


supervised, directed, owned, controlled, financed, or subsidized, in


whole or in part, by any government of a foreign country or foreign


political party, or by any other foreign principal from a country of


particular concern;


4. Copies of each written agreement and the terms and


conditions of each oral agreement, including all modifications of


such agreements, or, where no contract exists, a full statement of


all the circumstances, by reason of which the registrant is an agent


of a foreign principal from a country of particular concern; a


comprehensive statement of the nature and method of performance of

Req. No. 1008 Page 10


each such contract, and of the existing and proposed activity or


activities engaged in or to be engaged in by the registrant as an


agent of a foreign principal from a country of particular concern


for each such foreign principal from a country of particular


concern, including a detailed statement of any such activity which


is a political activity;


5. The nature and number of contributions, income, money, or


thing of value, if any, that the registrant has received within the


preceding one hundred eighty (180) days from each such foreign


principal from a country of particular concern, either as


compensation or for disbursement or otherwise, and the form and time


of each such payment and from whom such payment was received;


6. A detailed statement of every activity which the registrant


is performing or is assuming or purporting or has agreed to perform


for himself or herself or any other person other than a foreign


principal from a country of particular concern and which requires


his or her registration under this act, including a detailed


statement of any such activity which is a political activity;


7. The name, business, and residence addresses, and if an


individual, the nationality, of any person other than a foreign


principal from a country of particular concern for whom the


registrant is acting, assuming or purporting to act, or has agreed


to act under such circumstances as required by his or her


registration under this act; the extent to which each such person is

Req. No. 1008 Page 11


supervised, directed, owned, controlled, financed, or subsidized, in


whole or in part, by any government of a foreign country or foreign


political party or by any other foreign principal from a country of


particular concern; and the nature and amount of contributions,


income, money, or thing of value, if any, that the registrant has


received during the preceding one hundred eighty (180) days from


each such person in connection with any of the activities referred


to in paragraph 6 of this subsection, either as compensation or for


disbursement or otherwise, and the form and time of each such


payment and from whom received;


8. A detailed statement of the money and other things of value


spent or disposed of by the registrant during the preceding one


hundred eighty (180) days in furtherance of or in connection with


activities which require his or her registration under this act and


which have been undertaken by him or her either as an agent of a


foreign principal from a country of particular concern or for


himself or herself or any other person or in connection with any


activities relating to his or her becoming an agent of such


principal from a country of particular concern, and a detailed


statement of any contributions of money or other things of value


made by him or her during the preceding one hundred eighty (180)


days other than contributions prohibited under federal law in


connection with an election to any political office or in connection



Req. No. 1008 Page 12


with any primary election, convention, or caucus held to select


candidates for any political office;


9. Copies of each written agreement and the terms and


conditions of each oral agreement, including all modifications of


such agreements, or, where no contract exists, a full statement of


all the circumstances, by reason of which the registrant is


performing or assuming or purporting or has agreed to perform for


himself or herself or for a foreign principal from a country of


particular concern or for any person other than a foreign principal


from a country of particular concern any activities which require


his or her registration under this act;


10. Such other statements, information, or documents pertinent


to the purposes of this subsection as the Attorney General, having


due regard for the national security and the public interest, may


require; and


11. Any further statements and copies of documents necessary to


make the statements made in the registration statement and


supplements, and the copies of accompanying documents, not


misleading.


B. Every agent of a foreign principal from a country of


particular concern who has filed a registration statement required


by subsection A of this section shall, within thirty (30) days after


the expiration of each period of six (6) months succeeding such


filing, file with the Attorney General a supplement to the statement

Req. No. 1008 Page 13


under oath, on a form prescribed by the Attorney General, which


shall set forth with respect to the preceding six (6) months’ period


such facts as the Attorney General, having due regard for the


national security and the public interest, may deem necessary to


make the information required under this section accurate, complete,


and current with respect to such period. In connection with the


information furnished under paragraphs 3, 4, 6, and 9 of subsection


A of this section, the registrant shall give notice to the Attorney


General of any changes within ten (10) days after such changes


occur. If the Attorney General, having due regard for the national


security and the public interest, determines that it is necessary to


carry out the purposes of this act, he or she may, in any particular


case, require supplements to the registration statement to be filed


at more frequent intervals in respect to all or particular items of


information to be furnished.


C. The registration statement and supplements shall be executed


under oath as follows: If the registrant is an individual, by him


or her; if the registrant is a partnership, by the majority of the


members thereof; if the registrant is a person other than an


individual or a partnership, by a majority of the officers thereof


or persons performing the functions of officers or by a majority of


the board of directors thereof or persons performing the functions


of directors, if any.



Req. No. 1008 Page 14


D. The fact that a registration statement or supplement has


been filed shall not be deemed a full compliance with this act and


any regulations under this act on the part of the registrant, nor


shall it indicate that the Attorney General has in any way passed


upon the merits of such registration statement or supplement. Such


filing shall not preclude prosecution for willful failure to file a


registration statement or supplement when due, for a willful false


statement of a material fact or the willful omission of a material


fact required to be stated, or the willful omission of a material


fact or copy of a material document necessary to make the statements


made in a registration statement and supplements, and the copies of


accompanying documents, not misleading.


E. If an agent of a foreign principal from a country of


particular concern required to register under the provisions of this


act has previously registered, the Attorney General, in order to


eliminate inappropriate duplication, may permit incorporation by


reference in the registration statement or supplements filed under


this act of any information or documents previously filed by such


agent of a foreign principal from a country of particular concern


under the provisions of this section.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13003 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 1008 Page 15


Any person who acted as an agent of a foreign principal from a


country of particular concern at any time after January 1, 2014, and


until the effective date of this act shall file with the Attorney


General a true and complete retroactive registration statement and


supplements as required under Section 3 of this act.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13004 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The requirements of Sections 3 and 4 of this act shall not apply


to the following agents of foreign principals:


1. A duly accredited diplomatic or consular officer of a


foreign government who is so recognized by the United States


Department of State, while the officer is engaged exclusively in


activities that are recognized by the United States Department of


State as being within the scope of the functions of the officer;


2. Any official of a foreign government, if such government is


recognized by the United States, who is not a public relations


counsel, publicity agent, information service employee, or a citizen


of the United States, whose name and status and the character of


whose duties as such official are of public record with the United


States Department of State, while the official is engaged


exclusively in activities that are recognized by the Department of


State as being within the scope of the functions of such official;



Req. No. 1008 Page 16


3. Any member of the staff of, or any person employed by, a


duly accredited diplomatic or consular officer of a foreign


government who is so recognized by the United States Department of


State, other than a public relations counsel, publicity agent, or


information service employee, whose name and status and the


character of whose duties as such member or employee are of public


record in the United States Department of State, while the member or


employee is engaged exclusively in the performance of activities


that are recognized by the United States Department of State as


being within the scope of the functions of such member or employee;


or


4. Any person qualified to practice law in this state, if he or


she engages or agrees to engage in the legal representation of a


disclosed foreign principal from a country of particular concern


before any state court or any agency of this state or an entity of a


political subdivision of this state; provided, for purposes of this


act, legal representation does not include attempts to influence or


persuade agency personnel or officials other than in the course of


judicial proceedings, criminal or civil law enforcement inquiries,


investigations, or proceedings, or agency proceedings required by


statute or regulation to be conducted on the record.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13005 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

Req. No. 1008 Page 17


A. Any person within this state who is an agent of a foreign


principal from a country of particular concern and who is required


to register under the provisions of this act, who transmits or


causes to be transmitted in the United States mail or by any means


or instrumentality of interstate or foreign commerce any


informational materials for or in the interests of the foreign


principal from a country of particular concern (i) in the form of


prints, or (ii) in any other form which is reasonably adapted to


being, or which he or she believes will be or intends to be,


disseminated or circulated among two or more persons shall, no later


than forty-eight (48) hours after the beginning of the transmittal,


file two copies of the materials with the Attorney General.


B. It shall be unlawful for any person within the United States


who is an agent of a foreign principal from a country of particular


concern and required to register under the provisions of this act to


transmit or cause to be transmitted in the United States mail or by


any means or instrumentality of interstate or foreign commerce any


informational materials for or in the interests of such foreign


principal without placing in the informational materials a


conspicuous statement that the materials are distributed by the


agent on behalf of the foreign principal and that additional


information is on file with the Attorney General. The Attorney


General shall determine what constitutes a conspicuous statement for


the purposes of this section.

Req. No. 1008 Page 18


C. The copies of informational materials required by this


section to be filed with the Attorney General shall be available for


public inspection under such regulations as the Attorney General may


prescribe.


D. Under the provisions of this act, it shall be unlawful for


any person who is an agent of a foreign principal from a country of


particular concern within this state to transmit, convey, or


otherwise furnish to any government agency or official of this


state, including any member or committee of the Legislature or


governing body of a political subdivision, any political propaganda,


or to request from any such agency or official any information or


advice with respect to any matter pertaining to the political or


public interests, policies, relations, or political party that is in


the interests of the foreign principal from a country of particular


concern or pertaining to the foreign or domestic policies of the


United States or this state, unless the propaganda or the request is


prefaced or accompanied by a true and accurate statement to the


effect that such person is registered as an agent of a foreign


principal from a country of particular concern.


E. Whenever any agent of a foreign principal from a country of


particular concern required to register under this act appears


before a committee of the Legislature or a governing body of a


political subdivision to testify for or in the interests of the


foreign principal, he or she shall, at the time of such appearance,

Req. No. 1008 Page 19


furnish the committee with a copy of his or her most recent


registration statement filed with the Attorney General as an agent


of the foreign principal from a country of particular concern for


inclusion in the records of the committee as part of the testimony.


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13006 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Any agent of a foreign principal from a country of particular


concern registered under this act shall keep and preserve while an


agent of a foreign principal the books of account and other records


with respect to all of his or her activities, the disclosure of


which is required under the provisions of this act, in accordance


with such business and accounting practices, and shall preserve the


same for a period of three (3) years following the termination of


such status. Until regulations are in effect under this section,


any agent of a foreign principal from a country of particular


concern shall keep books of account and shall preserve all written


records with respect to his or her activities. Such books and


records shall be open at all reasonable times to the inspection of


any official charged with the enforcement of this act. It shall be


unlawful for any person to willfully conceal, destroy, obliterate,


mutilate, or falsify, or to attempt to conceal, destroy, obliterate,


mutilate, or falsify, or to cause to be concealed, destroyed,



Req. No. 1008 Page 20


obliterated, mutilated, or falsified, any books or records required


to be kept under the provisions of this act.


SECTION 8. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13007 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Attorney General shall retain one copy of all


registration statements furnished under this act, and such


statements shall be public records and open to public examination


and inspection at such reasonable hours as the Attorney General may


prescribe. Copies of such statements shall be furnished to every


applicant at a reasonable fee prescribed by the Attorney General.


B. Upon receipt, the Attorney General shall promptly transmit


one copy of any registration statement, amendment, or supplement


filed under this act to the United States Secretary of State for


comment and use as the Secretary of State determines to be


appropriate for the foreign relations of the United States. Failure


of the Attorney General to transmit such copy shall not be a bar to


prosecution under this act.


C. The Attorney General may furnish to departments and agencies


in the executive branch and committees of the Legislature any


information obtained in the administration of this act, including


the names of registrants, copies of registration statements or parts


of such statements, or other documents or information filed under


this act as may be appropriate.

Req. No. 1008 Page 21


D. Every six (6) months, the Attorney General shall report to


the Legislature information concerning administration of this act


including registrations filed, and the nature, sources, and content


of political propaganda disseminated and distributed. Such


information shall be made available monthly on the website of the


Attorney General.


SECTION 9. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13008 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Each officer or director, or person performing the functions of


an officer or director, of an agent of a foreign principal from a


country of particular concern which is not an individual shall cause


such agent to execute and file a registration statement and


supplements when such filing is required under subsections A and B


of Section 3 or under Section 4 of this act and shall cause the


agent to comply with all other requirements of this act.


Dissolution of an organization acting as an agent of a foreign


principal from a country of particular concern shall not relieve any


officer or director, or person performing the functions of an


officer or director, from complying with the provisions of this


section. In case of failure of any agent of a foreign principal


from a country of particular concern to comply with the requirements


of this act, each of its officers or directors, or persons



Req. No. 1008 Page 22


performing the functions of officers or directors, shall be subject


to prosecution for such failure to comply.


SECTION 10. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13009 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any person who willfully:


1. Violates any provision of this act or any regulation


promulgated pursuant to this act; or


2. In any registration statement, supplement, or other document


filed with or furnished to the Attorney General under this act:


a. makes a false statement of a material fact,


b. omits any material fact required to be stated therein,


or


c. omits a material fact or a copy of a material document


necessary to make such statements or the copy of


documents furnished not misleading,


shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by a fine


not to exceed One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or by


imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a


term not to exceed five (5) years, or by both such fine and


imprisonment. In the case of a violation of Section 6 of this act


or of subsection G of this section, the punishment shall be a fine


not to exceed Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) or a term of



Req. No. 1008 Page 23


imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one (1) year, or both


such fine and imprisonment.


B. Any person who is a student, faculty member, researcher,


adjunct, or otherwise employed or associated with an institution


within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education who willfully:


1. Violates any provision of this act or any regulation


promulgated under such provision; or


2. In any registration statement or supplement or in any other


document filed with or furnished to the Attorney General under the


provisions of this subsection:


a. makes a false statement of a material fact,


b. omits any material fact required to be stated therein,


or


c. omits a material fact or a copy of a material document


necessary to make such statements or the copy of


documents furnished not misleading,


shall, upon conviction, be expelled or dismissed from any role with


an institution of higher education in this state and shall be


prohibited from entering any campus in this state.


C. In any proceeding under this act in which it is charged that


a person is an agent of a foreign principal from a country of


particular concern with respect to a foreign principal outside of


the United States, proof of the specific identity of the foreign



Req. No. 1008 Page 24


principal from a country of particular concern shall be permissible


but not necessary.


D. Any alien who shall be convicted of a violation of, or a


conspiracy to violate, any provision of this act or any regulation


thereunder shall be subject to referral to the United States


Department of Justice for removal pursuant to Chapter 4 of Title II


of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C.A., Section 1221 et


seq.


E. Failure to file any such registration statement or


supplements as is required by either subsection A or B of Section 3


of this act shall be considered a continuing offense for as long as


such failure exists, notwithstanding any statute of limitation or


other statute to the contrary.


F. Whenever in the judgment of the Attorney General, any person


who is engaged in or about to engage in any acts which constitute or


will constitute a violation of, or fails to comply with, any


provision of this act, the Attorney General may make application to


the appropriate state court for an order enjoining such acts or


enjoining such person from continuing to act as an agent of such


foreign principal from a country of particular concern, or for an


order requiring compliance with any appropriate provision of the


act. The state court shall have jurisdiction and authority to issue


a temporary or permanent injunction, restraining order, or such


other order, which it may deem proper.

Req. No. 1008 Page 25


G. If the Attorney General determines that a registration


statement does not comply with the requirements of this act, he or


she shall so notify the registrant in writing, specifying in what


respects the statement is deficient. It shall be unlawful for any


person to act as an agent of a foreign principal from a country of


particular concern at any time ten (10) days or more after receipt


of such notification without filing an amended registration


statement in full compliance with the requirements of this act.


H. It shall be unlawful for any agent of a foreign principal


from a country of particular concern required to register under this


act to be a party to any contract, agreement, or understanding,


either express or implied, with such foreign principal from a


country of particular concern pursuant to which the amount or


payment of the compensation, fee, or other remuneration of such


agent is contingent in whole or in part upon the success of any


political activities carried on by such agent.


SECTION 11. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13010 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


The Attorney General shall promulgate rules necessary to


effectuate the provisions of this act, and may at any time make,


prescribe, amend, and rescind any forms as he or she may deem


necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act.



Req. No. 1008 Page 26


SECTION 12. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1008 TEK 1/19/2025 5:46:46 AM











































Req. No. 1008 Page 27